fi: Lelut ja pelit > Lelut > Taide- ja piirustuslelut: Helmi- ja korusetit; Värityskirjat ja -lehtiöt; Käsityösetit; Maalaustelineet ja taidepöydät; Väritä numeroiden mukaan -setit; Muovailuvahat ja -massat; Spiraalilevytaidesarjat; Leima- ja leimasinsarjat; Sapluunat ja jäljityspaperit; Tarrat ja tarrakoneet; Piirustustabletit
fr: Jeux et jouets > Jouets > Jeux de dessin: Kits de perlage et de fabrication de bijoux; Livres et blocs de coloriage; Coffrets de loisirs créatifs; Chevalets et bureaux d'art; Kits de peinture par numéro; Pâte à modeler et pâte à fixer; Kits d'art en rotation et en spirale; Ensembles de tampons et tampons encreurs; Pochoirs et papiers calques; Autocollants et machines à autocollants; Tablettes à dessin
hu: Játékok és játékszerek > Játékok > Művészet és rajzjátékok: Gyöngyfűző és ékszerkészítő készletek; Kifestőkönyvek és -tömbök; Kézműves készletek; Állvány- és művészi íróasztalok; Számok szerinti festő készletek; Játéktészta és -gyurma; Pörgettyűs és spirális művészeti készletek; Bélyegző- és bélyegzőlapkészletek; Stencil és pauszpapírok; Matricák és matricagépek; Játék rajztáblák
th: ของเล่นและเกม > ของเล่น > ของเล่นศิลปะและการวาด: ชุดทำลูกปัดและเครื่องประดับ; หนังสือและแผ่นระบายสี; ชุดงานฝีมือ; ขาตั้งและโต๊ะงานศิลปะ; ชุดระบายสีตามตัวเลข; แป้งและปูนของเล่น; ชุดศิลปะวงกลมและเกลียว; ชุดตราประทับและแท่นประทับตรา; กระดาษลายฉลุและกระดาษลอกลาย; สติกเกอร์และเครื่องติดสติกเกอร์; กระดานวาดรูปเด็กเล่น
tr: Oyuncaklar ve Oyunlar > Oyuncaklar > Sanat ve Çizim Oyuncakları: Boncuk ve Takı Yapımı Kitleri; Boyama Kitapları ve Bloknotları; El İşi Setleri; Şövale ve Resim Masaları; Numaraya Göre Boyama Kitleri; Oyun Hamuru ve Macunu; Döndürme ve Spiral Sanat Setleri; Damga ve Damga Tampon Setleri; Şablon ve Aydınger Kağıtları; Çıkartma ve Çıkartma Makineleri; Oyuncak Çizim Tabletleri
sk-SK: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Hračky na maľovanie a kreslenie: Súpravy na výrobu korálkov a šperkov; Omaľovánky a podložky; Kreatívne súpravy; Stojany a výtvarné stoly; Súpravy pre maľovanie podľa čísel; Plastelína; Súpravy špirálového umenia; Súpravy pečiatok a podložiek; Šablóny a pauzovacie papiere; Samolepky a samolepiace stroje; Tablety na kreslenie
pt-BR: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Brinquedos de arte e desenho: Kits para fazer bijuteria e joia; Livros e almofadas para colorir; Kits de artesanato; Cavaletes e mesas de arte; Kits de pintura por número; Massinhas para crianças; Kits de arte em rotação e espiral; Conjuntos de carimbos e almofadas para carimbos; Estêncil e papéis de decalque; Adesivos e máquinas de adesivos; Prancheta de desenho de brinquedo
cs: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Umělecké a kreslicí hračky: Sady pro korálkování a výrobu šperků; Knížky a bločky s omalovánkami; Hobby sady; Umělecké stolní stojany a pracovní stoly; Sady pro malování podle čísel; Modelína a chytrá modelína; Výtvarné sady – spirografy; Sady razítek a razítkovacích polštářků; Šablony a obkreslovací papíry; Samolepky a přístroje na výrobu samolepek; Kreslicí tabulky
ja: おもちゃ・ゲーム > おもちゃ > お絵かき: ビーズ・ジュエリー製作キット; 塗り絵・パッド; クラフトキット; イーゼル・アートデスク; 数字でペイントするキット; 工作用粘土・パテ; スピン・スパイラルアートキット; スタンプ・スタンプパッドセット; ステンシル・トレーシングペーパー; ステッカー・ステッカーマシン; お絵かきテーブル
nb: Leker og spill > Leker > Kunst- og tegneleker: Sett for perle- og smykkefremstilling; Fargebøker og -blokker; Hobbysett; Staffeli- og kunstbord; Mal-etter-nummer-sett; Plastilina og deig; Spinn- og spiralkunstsett; Stempel- og stempelputesett; Sjablonger og kalkerpapir; Klistremerker og klistremerkemaskiner; Tegnebrett
bg-BG: Играчки и игри > Играчки > Играчки за творчество и рисуване: Мъниста и комплекти за правене на бижута; Книжки и блокчета за оцветяване; Творчески комплекти; Стативи и бюра за творчество; Комплекти за рисуване по номера; Моделин и тесто за игра; Комплекти за въртене и спирала; Комплекти за печати и подложки за печати; Шаблони и хартии за прекопиране; Стикери и машини за стикери; Играчки таблети за рисуване
it: Giochi e giocattoli > Giocattoli > Giocattoli artistici e da disegno: Kit per creare gioielli e perline; Libri e blocchi da colorare; Kit artigianali; Cavalletto e scrivanie per arte; Kit di verniciatura per numero; Paste modellabili; Kit artistici rotanti e a spirale; Set di timbri e cuscinetti per timbri; Stencil e carte da lucido; Adesivi e macchine per adesivi; Tavolette disegno giocattolo
ko: 장난감/게임 > 장난감 > 아트/그리기 장난감: 비드/주얼리 만들기 키트; 컬러링 북/패드; 공작 키트; 이젤/미술 책상; 번호 색칠 키트; 어린이 공작용 점토/퍼티; 스핀/스피럴 그림 키트; 스탬프/스탬프 패드 세트; 스텐실/트레이싱지; 스티커/스티커 기계; 장난감 드로잉 태블릿
zh-CN: 玩具/游戏 > 玩具 > 绘画玩具: 串珠和珠宝制作套件; 涂色书/涂色板; 手工套件; 画架/绘画桌; 按数字涂颜色套件; 橡皮泥/彩泥; 旋转/螺旋图案绘画套件; 邮票和印章垫套装; 蜡纸/描图纸; 贴纸和贴纸机; 玩具绘画板/写字板
sv: Leksaker och spel > Leksaker > Konst- och ritleksaker: Pärl- och smyckestillverkningskit; Målarböcker och block; Hantverkskit; Staffli och konstbord; Måla-efter-nummer-kit; Modellera och kitt; Spinn- och spiralkonstkit; Stämpel- stämpeldyneset; Stencil- och kalkerpapper; Klistermärken och klistermärkemaskiner; Leksaksritbräden
es: Juegos y juguetes > Juguetes > Juguetes de dibujo y artesanía: Kits de fabricación de joyas y abalorios; Libros y cuadernos para colorear; Kits de manualidades; Caballetes y pupitres de arte; Kits de pintura por número; Play-Doh y masilla; Kits de arte giratorio y en espiral; Juegos de sellos y almohadillas para sellos; Plantillas y papeles de calco; Pegatinas y máquinas de pegatinas; Tabletas de dibujo
lt-LT: Žaislai ir žaidimai > Žaislai > Meno ir piešimo žaislai: Karoliukų ir papuošalų kūrimo rinkiniai; Spalvinimo knygutės ir bloknotai; Rankdarbių rinkiniai; Molbertai ir piešimo stalai; Spalvinimo pagal skaičius rinkiniai; Plastelinas ir šlykštukai; Piešimo sukučiais ir spiralėmis rinkiniai; Antspaudų ir antspaudų bloknotų rinkiniai; Trafaretai ir kalkinis popieriai; Lipdukai ir lipdukų įrenginiai; Žaislinės piešimo planšetės
pt-PT: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Brinquedos de arte e desenho: Kits de miçangas e para fazer joalharia; Livros e blocos para colorir; Kits para trabalhos manuais; Cavaletes e mesas de arte; Kits de pintura por números; Plasticina e massa de modelar; Kits de arte rotativos e em espiral; Conjuntos de carimbos e almofadas para carimbos; Estêncil e papéis de decalque; Adesivos e máquinas de adesivos; Brinquedos de placas de desenho
de: Spielzeuge & Spiele > Spielzeuge > Spielzeuge zum Malen & Zeichnen: Sets zur Perlen- & Schmuckherstellung; Malbücher & Blöcke; Bastelsets; Staffeleien & Kunstschreibtische; Malen-nach-Zahlen-Sets; Spielteig & Knetmasse; Kurven-und-Spiralenkunst-Sets; Stempel- & Stempelkissen-Sets; Schablonen- & Transparentpapier; Aufkleber & Aufklebermaschinen; Zeichentafeln
en: Toys & Games > Toys > Art & Drawing Toys: Beading & Jewelry Making Kits; Coloring Books & Pads; Craft Kits; Easel & Art Desks; Paint-By-Number Kits; Play Dough & Putty; Spin & Spiral Art Kits; Stamp & Stamp Pad Sets; Stencil & Tracing Papers; Stickers & Sticker Machines; Toy Drawing Tablets
el: Παιχνίδια > Παιχνίδια (Toys) > Παιχνίδια τέχνης και ζωγραφικής: Σετ κατασκευής κοσμημάτων & χαντρών; Βιβλία & μπλοκ ζωγραφικής; Σετ χειροτεχνίας; Καβαλέτα & γραφεία τέχνης; Σετ ζωγραφικής με αριθμούς; Πλαστελίνες & στόκος; Σετ τέχνης περιστροφής & σπιράλ; Σετ σφραγίδων & ταμπόν; Χαρτιά στένσιλ & ιχνογραφίας; Αυτοκόλλητα & μηχανές αυτοκόλλητων; Ταμπλέτες σχεδίασης για παιδιά
nl: Speelgoed en spellen > Speelgoed > Kleuren en tekenen: Sets om kralen en sieraden te maken; Kleurboeken en -pads; Hobbysets; Ezel- en kleurbureaus; Verf-op-nummersets; Plastic klei; Spin- en spiraalkunstkits; Stempel- en stempelpadsets; Sjabloon- en overtrekpapier; Stickers en stickermachines; Speelgoedtekentabletten
vi: Đồ chơi & Trò chơi > Đồ chơi > Đồ chơi hội họa và nghệ thuật: Bộ dụng cụ làm đồ trang sức & xâu hạt; Sách & tập tô màu; Bộ sản phẩm thủ công; Giá vẽ & bàn nghệ thuật; Bộ sản phẩm sơn theo số; Đất và bột nặn; Bộ dụng cụ nghệ thuật xoay và xoắn ốc; Bộ tem và hộp mực đóng dấu; Giấy nến & giấy can; Nhãn dán & máy dán nhãn; Bảng vẽ cho bé
ru: Игрушки и игры > Игрушки > Игрушки для творчества: Наборы для бисероплетения и изготовления украшений; Раскраски; Наборы для творчества; Мольберты и столы для рисования; Наборы для раскрашивания по номерам; Пластилин и жвачка для рук; Спирографы; Наборы штампов и подушечек; Трафаретная и копировальная бумага; Наклейки и устройства для создания наклеек; Доски для рисования
pl: Gry i zabawki > Zabawki > Zabawki artystyczne i malarskie: Zestawy do tworzenia biżuterii i koralików; Kolorowanki i podkładki; Zestawy zręcznościowe; Sztalugi i biurka dla artystów; Zestawy do malowania po numerach; Plastelina i modelina; Zestawy artystyczne Spin & Spiral; Zestawy stempli i poduszek do stempli; Szablony i kalki kreślarskie; Naklejki i maszynki do naklejek; Tablice rysunkowe
ro-RO: Jucării și jocuri > Jucării > Jucării artistice și de desen: Seturi pentru cusut mărgele și creare de bijuterii; Cărți și caiete de colorat; Seturi pentru artizanat; Mese pentru șevalete și proiecte artistice; Seturi pentru colorat pe numere; Plastilină; Seturi Spin & Spiral; Seturi de ștampile și ștampile; Șabloane și hârtii pentru desen după model; Autocolante și mașini pentru autocolante; Tablete de desen de jucărie
sl-SI: Igrače in igre > Igrače > Igrače za umetniško ustvarjanje in risanje: Kompleti za izdelavo biserov in nakita; Pobarvanke in bloki za barvanje; Kompleti za ročna dela; Stojala in likovne mize; Kompleti za barvanje po številkah; Modelirne mase in plastelin; Kompleti za spin art in risanje spiralnih vencev; Kompleti žigov in blazinic za žig; Šablone in paus papirji; Nalepke in stroji za nalepke; Risalne tablice
da: Legetøj og spil > Legetøj > Kreativitets- og tegnelegetøj: Perle- og smykkefremstillingssæt; Malebøger og -puder; Kreativitetssæt; Staffeli og kunstborde; Mal-tallene-sæt; Trylledej og modellervoks; Spin & Spiral-sæt; Sæt med stempel og stempelpuder; Stencil- og kalkerpapir; Klistermærker og klistermærkemaskiner; Tegnebræt til børn
hr-HR: Igračke i igre > Igračke > Igračke za umjetnost i crtanje: Setovi za izradu nakita; Bojanke i blokovi; Setovi za rukotvorine; Slikarski stalci i stolovi; Setovi za bojanje po brojevima; Plastelin za igru; Setovi za Spin & Spiral crtanje; Setovi žigova i jastučića za žigove; Šablone i paus papiri; Naljepnice i strojevi za naljepnice; Dječji tableti za crtanje
zh-TW: 玩具和遊戲 > 玩具 > 藝術與繪畫玩具: 串珠首飾製作工具包; 著色本和著色墊; 手工工藝工具包; 畫架和畫桌; 數字繪畫工具包; 玩具黏土; 旋轉/螺旋藝術工具包; 印章/印章墊組; 模板/描圖紙; 貼紙/貼紙機; 玩具畫板